Maryland, session 2025, HB1334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 12 – Garrett County
30.21.
(A) (1) Except for transactions under PARAGRAPHS (5) AND (6) OF THIS
DIVISION OR division (D) of this section, professional services required to be licensed by
the State of Maryland, or as otherwise authorized by law, the County Commissioners, or
any employee of Garrett County, may not enter into any contract of sale or purchase to
which the county is a party where the amount involved under the contract exceeds $50,000
without advertising for bids in one or more newspapers circulated in the county.
Professional services required to be licensed by the State of Maryland may be solicited by
written bids.
(2) The advertisement for bids shall appear at least a week prior to the date
on which bids are to be filed.
(3) Any contract of sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder,
and any contract of purchase shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, but the
County Commissioners shall have the right to reject any and all bids.
(4) Any contract entered into in violation of the provisions of this section
shall be null and void. The provisions of this section shall not apply to necessary repairs
made in case of emergency.
– 1 –

Ch. 779 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS, OR ANY EMPLOYEE OF GARRETT
COUNTY, MAY ENTER INTO A PURCHASE OR WORK PROJECT CONTRACT FOR AN
INDETERMINATE AMOUNT OF GOODS OR SERVICES PROCURED ON AN AS–NEEDED
BASIS OVER A PERIOD OF TIME WITHOUT ADVERTISING FOR BIDS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS DIVISION. THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES REGARDLESS OF
WHETHER THE CUMULATIVE TOTAL EXCEEDS $50,000.
(6) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS, OR ANY EMPLOYEE OF GARRETT
COUNTY, MAY ENTER INTO A CONTRACT FOR THE PURCHASE OF ONE OR MORE
VEHICLES FOR AN AMOUNT UP TO $100,000 WITHOUT ADVERTISING FOR BIDS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS DIVISION.
[(5)] (7) If any County Commissioner shall violate any provisions of this
division, the Commissioner shall be liable to indictment, and, upon conviction, shall forfeit
the office.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –